Illinois, session 104th, SB182.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5adding Section 59.18 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 5/59.18 new)7    Sec. 59.18. Sole source aquifer carbon sequestration 8operations prohibited. No person shall conduct a carbon 9sequestration activity over any federally designated sole 10source aquifer, including, without limitation, the Mahomet 11Sole Source Aquifer. The Agency shall not issue a carbon 12sequestration permit under this Title if the Agency knows that 13the applicant is intending to conduct carbon sequestration 14activity over any federally designated sole source aquifer, 15including, without limitation, the Mahomet Sole Source 16Aquifer. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.